Washington statutes.
RCW 32.50.080

Authority of director to act—Administrative discretion.

If the director determines to act under authority of this chapter, the sequence of his or her acts and proceedings shall be as set forth in this chapter. However, it is the purpose and substance of this chapter to authorize administrative discretion, to allow the director administrative discretion in the event of unsound banking operations, and in furtherance of that purpose the director is hereby authorized to proceed with regulation either under this chapter or under any other applicable provisions of law or under this chapter in connection with other law, either as such law is now existing or is hereinafter enacted, and it is so provided.

[ 2010 c 88 s 73.]